(Filed by the Plantiffs on July 6, 1992, in the court of Judge Charles Richey ) UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA ____________________________________________ ) SCOTT ARMSTRONG, et al., ) ) Plaintiffs, ) ) v. ) C.A. No. 89-0142 CRR ) EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT, et al., ) ) Defendants.
) ___________________________________________) PLAINTIFFS' OPPOSITION TO DEFENDANTS' MOTION FOR SUMMARY JUDGMENT AND MEMORANDUM IN SUPPORT OF CROSS-MOTION FOR SUMMARY JUDGMENT ON THE ADEQUACY OF DEFENDANTS' RECORDKEEPING GUIDELINES AND THE ARCHIVIST'S FAILURE TO PERFORM HIS STATUTORY DUTIES.
Michael E. Tankersley Patti A. Goldman Alan B. Morrison Public Citizen Litigation Group Suite 700 2000 P Street, N.W. Washington, D.C. 20036 (202) 833-3000 Of Counsel: Kate Martin Sheryl Walter American Civil Liberties Union National Security Archive Foundation 1755 Massachusetts Ave., N.W. 122 Maryland Avenue, N.E. Washington, D.C. 20036 Washington, D.C. 20002 (202) 797-0882 (202) 675-2327 Attorneys for Plaintiffs TABLE OF CONTENTS Introduction 1 BACKGROUND 4 The Federal Records Acts 4 Statement of Facts 7 SUMMARY OF THE ARGUMENT 12 ARGUMENT 15 (Page number different in electronically transmitted version) I. THE INFORMATION PRESERVED ON DEFENDANTS' ELECTRONIC MAIL SYSTEMS IS "RECORD" MATERIAL UNDER THE FRA. 15 A. Defendants' Assertion That Most Electronic Mail Is Nonrecord Material Lacks Any Foundation.
15 B. Electronic Mail Communications Stored On The Backup Tapes And Electronic Mail Systems Are Records Because They Are Preserved Or Appropriate For Preservation 17 1.
The Backup Tapes Contain Communications That Are Appropriate for Preservation.
18 2.
Electronic Communications Preserved By Agency Personnel Are Records Under The FRA 20 II.
ELECTRONIC MAIL MATERIALS ARE NOT "EXTRA COPIES PRESERVED ONLY FOR CONVENIENCE OF REFERENCE."
23 A. Defendants Originally Gave No Instructions On Preservation Of Electronic Mail, And Now Give Instructions That Are Erroneous As A Matter of Law.
24 1.
Defendants' Recordkeeping Guidelines During The Period That The Information On The Preserved Backup Tapes Was Created.
25 a.
The EOP's Guidelines.
25 b.
The NSC's Guidelines.
26 2.
Defendants' Recordkeeping Guidelines Since January, 1989.
30 3.
Defendants' Oral Guidance.
33 B. Electronic Mail Materials Are Not "Extra Copies Preserved Only For Convenience of Reference."
35 1.
When Information Is Recorded In Both Electronic And Paper Formats, Both Formats Are Records.
35 2.
PROFS Contains Information Recorded Only In Electronic Form.
37 3.
Information Recorded Electronically On PROFS Is Not Preserved Only For Convenience of Reference.
39 III.
DEFENDANTS' GUIDELINES ON DISTINGUISHING FEDERAL RECORD, PRESIDENTIAL RECORD, AND NONRECORD INFORMATION ARE ERRONEOUS AND INADEQUATE.
40 A.
The NSC Has Erroneously Instructed Staff To Treat Federal Records As Nonrecord Material.
41 B.
The EOP Has Failed To Provide Accurate, Specific Guidelines On Distinguishing Record and Nonrecord Materials.
43 C.
The EOP and NSC Have Erroneously Instructed Staff To Treat Federal Records As Presidential Records.
45 1.
EOP Records Are Agency Records Unless The Sole Function of The Component Agency Is To Advise And Assist The President.
45 2.
The Guidelines of The OSTP Erroneously Label Federal Records As Presidential Records.
49 3.
The Guidelines of The NSC Erroneously Label Federal Records As Presidential Records.
50 a.
The NSC's Guidelines Improperly Classify Communications Between NSC Staff As Presidential Records 51 b.
The NSC's Guidelines Improperly Treat Records Of The APNSAs and Deputy APNSAs As Exempt From the FRA 54 4.
The Guidelines Fail To Identify The Records Of The Regulatory Task Forces As Federal Records.
56 IV.
DEFENDANTS HAVE FAILED TO ESTABLISH A MANAGEMENT PROGRAM AND SAFEGUARDS FOR ELECTRONIC MAIL. 59 V. THE ARCHIVIST HAS FAILED TO CARRY OUT HIS DUTY TO TAKE ACTION TO RECOVER IMPROPERLY DESTROYED AGENCY RECORDS 63 CONCLUSION 67
Introduction On June 18, 1985, the National Archives released a bulletin to the heads of federal agencies reporting that "Federal agencies are relying increasingly upon electronic office equipment and systems to create, maintain, use and dispose of records" and, as a result, "many records, the basis for official policy decisions, may never appear in paper form."
To prevent "a tremendous increase in the unauthorized destruction of Federal records," the Archives instructed agencies to institute plans for keeping records in electronic form and to undertake a major training effort to educate staff on the recordkeeping issues presented by automated office systems.
Plfs' Appendix, Tab 1.
At about the same time that they received this bulletin, the National Security Council ("NSC") and other components of the Executive Office of the President ("EOP") introduced electronic mail systems known as the "Professional Office System" or "PROFS."
Despite the Archives' warning, neither the EOP nor the NSC introduced any directives, plans or programs to preserve records created on these electronic office systems, or to educate their staff on their preservation.
When the Archives reissued its bulletin in 1987, the EOP and the NSC, once again, ignored it.
Id., Tab 2.
As the Archives predicted, the EOP's and NSC's inaction led to "a tremendous increase in the unauthorized destruction of Federal records."
The investigations of the Iran-Contra Affairs have revealed that, in many cases, the only evidence of important, substantive communications concerning the policies, decisions and actions of the NSC during this period exists on the backup tapes of the NSC's electronic mail system.
But most of the electronic records from this period have been destroyed because staff were not instructed to preserve them and the agencies routinely erased the information on the backup tapes by reusing them.
The electronic records that survive are those on the backup tapes that escaped the agencies' normal procedures because of the Iran-Contra investigation and the restraining order entered at the beginning of this action.
Yet the EOP, the NSC and the Archivist still have not taken any steps to ensure that the important electronic records on these tapes are preserved.
Today, the use of electronic mail at the EOP and NSC has become even more widespread, but the agencies still have no program for preserving electronic mail records in accordance with the Federal Records Acts ("FRA").
In response to this litigation, the agencies issued new recordkeeping guidelines, but even the new guidelines misstate the definition of what constitutes a Federal record.
The agencies continue to treat the records stored electronically on their computer systems and backup tapes as "nonrecord" material and routinely destroy it without any appraisal of its archival value.
As a result, records concerning some of the most important acts, decisions and policies of the Federal government are being systematically erased each day as defendants reuse their backup tapes.
Indeed, defendants acknowledge that they have designed their electronic mail systems to conduct government business "off- the-record."
In their latest submission, they argue that if they succeed in their claim that they can deem all information stored electronically to be "nonrecord" under the FRA, they have also placed all of this information beyond the reach of the Freedom of Information Act.
They have established the system outside the records laws, they say, so that staff can control which, if any, of the electronic communications they write may be examined by historians or the public.
See Defs' Memorandum in Support of Summary Judgment On Narrowed FOIA Requests at 28-29.
The FRA flatly forbids agencies from establishing such a "nonrecord" record system.
In this memorandum we show that defendants' motion for summary judgment must be denied because the undisputed facts show that their guidelines on electronic mail are erroneous as a matter of law, and their practice of regularly destroying their electronic records as "nonrecord" material violates the FRA.
Accordingly, plaintiffs move for summary judgment, and request that the Court: 1.
Declare that defendants' recordkeeping practices prior to the initiation of this action were unlawful, and that the backup tapes preserved in connection with this action contain Federal records that must be retained in accordance with the FRA. 2.
Declare that defendants' current guidelines on preserving electronic mail are unlawful, and that defendants may not erase, destroy, or otherwise dispose of the information recorded on their electronic mail systems (including the current backup tapes in their custody) until they implement recordkeeping programs that comply with the FRA. 3.
Order the Archivist to investigate the recordkeeping practices of the EOP and NSC, and take action to assure that electronic records on the agencies' backup tapes are recovered and made part of the their records systems.
**1.
Consistent with Defendants' Supplemental Brief on Summary Judgment, plaintiffs here address Count II of the Second Amended Complaint relating to the adequacy of the guidelines, and Count IV concerning the Archivist's duties to initiate action to recover unlawfully removed records.
Because defendants now disclaim any reliance on the General Records Schedules as authority for their practices, Count III is no longer at issue.
Plaintiffs will address Count I, concerning plaintiffs' Freedom of Information Act claim, in responding to the motion filed by defendants on July 2, 1992.
See Defs' Supplemental Brief In Support of Motion for Summary Judgment, at 1 n.1** BACKGROUND The Federal Records Acts The Federal Records Acts define the obligations of federal agencies and the Archivist for maintaining complete and accurate documentation of the actions of the Federal government.
44 U.S.C. 2902.
**2.
The FRA is actually a series of statutes, which originated with the Federal Records Act of 1950 and the 1943 Disposal of Records Act.
44 U.S.C. 2101, et seq., 2901, et seq., 2901, 3101, et seq., 3301, et seq.** The requirements of the FRA apply to any materials that fall within the statutory definition of "record."
44 U.S.C. 3301.
There are three aspects of the definition that are important here: First, the statutory definition covers all formats and media, "regardless of physical form or characteristics."
Id.
Thus, agencies are specifically required to establish a program to ensure that information recorded electronically is managed in accordance with the FRA. 36 C.F.R. 1234.10, 1234.30.
Second, paper, electronic, or other documentary materials made or received by an agency qualify as Federal records if they are: preserved or appropriate for preservation by that agency . . .
[1] as evidence of the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures, operations, or other activities of the Government, or [2]
44 U.S.C. 3301.
The Archivist's regulations refer to this as "record status."
36 C.F.R. 1222.34(b).
Defendants sometimes refer to this as "rising to the level" of a Federal record.
See, e.g., Defs' Statement of Material Facts, 28.
Third, copies of materials that have record status are exempt from the statutory definition if they fall within one of three exceptions.
One of these exemptions, which covers "extra copies preserved only for convenience of reference," is at issue here.
44 U.S.C. 3301.
The FRA mandates that the head of each Federal agency shall "establish and maintain an active, continuing program for the economical and efficient management of the records of the agency" and "establish safeguards against the removal and loss of records," in compliance with the records statutes and their accompanying regulations.
Id. 3102, 3105.
But the ultimate responsibility for determining whether, when, and how record material may be disposed of is vested in the Archivist, not the agencies.
44 U.S.C. 3303, 3303a, 3314.
Agencies are prohibited from disposing of records without the approval of the Archivist.
36 C.F.R. 1220.38, 1234.32; see American Friends Serv.
Comm. v. Webster, 720 F.2d 29, 62-63 (D.C.
Cir. 1983) (describing Archivist's responsibilities in authorizing disposal).
The Archivist's authorization may be given in one of two ways: (1) for records that are common to several agencies, authorization is provided through General Records Schedules, 36 C.F.R. 1228.40; and (2) for other records, agencies must submit a specific request to the Archivist to approve disposition of the material as temporary records.
36 C.F.R. 1228.20(b).
The Archivist's staff, through a process known as "appraisal," is responsible for determining whether agency records are "permanent" or "temporary" records.
36 U.S.C. 1220.14; 44 U.S.C. 3303a(a).
Records with sufficient historical value are eventually transferred to the Archives as "permanent" records.
Id. 1228.28(c); 44 U.S.C. 2107.
For temporary records, the Archivist is responsible for authorizing disposition of the records after they have been retained for an appropriate period of time.
36 C.F.R. 1228.30; 44 U.S.C. 3302-3303a.
The Archivist is also responsible for preventing improper records practices by agencies.
The FRA directs that the Archivist shall "promulgate standards, procedures, and guidelines with respect to records management," and "conduct inspections or surveys of the records and the records management programs and practices within and between Federal agencies."
-44 U.S.C. 2904(c)(1), (7).
He is required to report violations of the statute and recommend corrective action.
Id. 2115(b).
If the unlawful destruction of agency records comes to his attention, the Archivist is required to notify the head of the agency and "assist the head of the agency in initiating action through the Attorney General for the recovery of records unlawfully removed and for other redress provided by law."
Id. 2905(a).
If the head of the Agency takes no action, the Archivist is required to request that the Attorney General initiate such action, and to notify the Congress.
Id. Statement of Facts The relevant facts are set forth in detail in plaintiffs' statement of undisputed facts.
("SoF") The facts in this case are complicated because, over the last seven years, the EOP and NSC have established several electronic mail systems, have maintained separate and different recordkeeping guidelines, and have increased and changed their guidelines.
These detailed facts, however, can be summarized in the following broader statements of ultimate facts, and mixed questions of law and fact, that establish plaintiffs' claim for relief: Certain components of the EOP, including the NSC, use electronic mail systems to transmit inter- and intra-office electronic mail, to share appointment calendars, to create and edit memoranda, and to transfer files and documents in electronic format.
Since the mid-1980s, the NSC and other components of the EOP have maintained separate electronic mail systems using an IBM software known as the "Professional Office System," or "PROFS."
SoF 1-31.
PROFS and other electronic mail systems store information in the computer so that it can be accessed, edited, transmitted, and re-transmitted electronically over the system.
Electronic mail notes are preserved in files that are comparable to paper files and are controlled by individual staff; calendars and documents are stored on-line in the computer for a year or longer.
In addition, both the EOP and NSC store electronic mail on "backup tapes" that are used to recover lost information in its original, electronic format.
SoF 32-37.
The NSC and EOP electronic mail systems and backup tapes contain information on the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures, operations, and other activities of the federal agencies that use the system.
The importance of these systems as a record of the activities of the government has been dramatized by the important role they played in providing information for investigations of the Iran-Contra Affairs, and the subsequent use of the PROFS backup tapes by the Justice Department and NSC.
SoF 54-61, 64.
The EOP and NSC have never made their electronic mail systems part of their recordkeeping program: (a) they have never conducted an examination or survey to assess the type or amount of information on the policies, decisions, and other agency activities recorded in PROFS files; (b) they have never sought to integrate recordkeeping considerations into the operation of these systems; (c) they have never evaluated the effectiveness of their recordkeeping practices with respect to electronic mail; (d) they have never established safeguards against staff erroneously destroying electronic materials; and (e) they have never obtained authorization from the Archivist to dispose of information recorded electronically on PROFS or any other electronic mail system.
SoF 65-84.
A number of PROFS backup tapes containing information recorded on the NSC and EOP PROFS systems between 1985 and the end of the Reagan Administration in January, 1989, have been preserved in connection this action.
During the period covered by these backup tapes, neither the EOP nor the NSC's recordkeeping manuals contained any instruction that electronic materials with information of "record status" must be printed for preservation in a paper format.
The only written guideline during this period that even comes close to such an instruction is in a memorandum distributed only to the NSC staff at the very end of the Reagan Administration, and the instructions in that memorandum give inaccurate guidance on what constitutes a Federal record.
SoF 89-98, 107-116, 135-140.
Since this suit was filed in January, 1989, the NSC, the Office of Administration ("OA") and the Council on Environmental Quality ("CEQ") have issued new recordkeeping guidelines.
These EOP units now give instructions that staff should convert certain information on electronic mail systems to hard-copy if the communication meets the agency's definition of a Federal record and the information does not appear elsewhere in a paper record.
Defendants rely on these instructions as justification for routinely destroying their PROFS materials as "extra copies retained only for convenience of reference."
44 U.S.C. 3301; SoF 99-106, 117-128, 141-143.
Paper copies of material printed out from defendants' electronic mail systems are not equivalent to the information recorded in its original, electronic format for several reasons.
The electronic format of the information may be more easily searched and managed and, thus, may be more valuable from an archival standpoint.
SoF 144-155.
Moreover, not all of the information recorded electronically on PROFS appears on paper print-outs.
SoF 40-53.
Finally, agency staff continue to modify and use the information in its original, electronic format for purposes other than reference.
SoF 32-37.
The NSC has issued instructions to its staff stating that drafts of documents seen by other members of the NSC staff or other agency personnel, correspondence between members of the NSC staff or other agency personnel, schedules of meetings and appointments, and electronic mail notes concerning "routine" office procedures are "nonrecord" materials.
SoF 128-134.
The EOP's guidelines on distinguishing Federal record and nonrecord materials quote the statutory definition and Archives' regulations, but provide no specific guidance to staff on what types of electronic mail communications must be preserved as records.
SoF 93.
Several component agencies of the EOP serve dual functions of advising the President and performing independent functions as "agencies" of the Federal government.
For most of these components, the EOP's recordkeeping guidelines provide that all records made or received by the staff are treated as Federal records.
In the case of the Office of Science and Technology Policy and NSC, however, the guidelines instruct staff that some of the records that the staff make or receive in the course of performing their official duties are not Federal records but, instead, should be treated as Presidential records.
SoF 157- 221.
During the Reagan and Bush Administration, agencies known as the Task Force on Regulatory Relief and Council on Competitiveness were established within the EOP.
The records made or received in performing the work of these entities are Federal records, but the EOP's guidelines make no provision for preserving these records in accordance with the FRA. SoF 222-227.
Despite specific reports concerning the destruction of electronic mail communications of the NSC during the Iran-Contra Affairs, and reports that it was the practice of some officials to routinely erase PROFS communications, the Archivist has made no effort to ensure that destroyed electronic records are recovered, and has never exercised his authority to evaluate the adequacy of the recordkeeping guidelines of the NSC or EOP. SoF 228-38.
SUMMARY OF THE ARGUMENT Plaintiffs' challenge to the NSC's and EOP's recordkeeping practices rests squarely on the language of the FRA and the official statements of the Archives.
Comparing defendants' guidelines with these standards shows that they are inconsistent with the plain text of the statute and the guidance of the agency charged with its interpretation.
Recordkeeping practices and guidelines are inadequate if "they permit the destruction of "records" that must be preserved under the FRA." Armstrong v. Bush, 924 F.2d 282, 291, 297 (D.C.
Cir. 1991).
Defendants' practice of not only permitting, but actively providing for the destruction of electronic mail communications by arbitrarily deeming it nonrecord material without even examining its content, makes clear that they cannot satisfy this test.
The FRA mandates that all records, including those in electronic form, must be preserved, unless the Archives has authorized disposal.
Defendants, however, routinely destroy electronic mail materials without any authorization from the Archivist.
To defend this practice, they assert that all such materials are "nonrecord" because: (1) most information preserved on their electronic mail systems is not "appropriate for preservation"; (2) if electronic mail communications do qualify as records, the electronic version is "nonrecord" material under the exemption for "extra copies preserved only for convenience of reference" because staff have been instructed to print on paper any communication that rises to the level of a "record"; and (3) the staff can determine which communications rise to the level of a record because they have been given accurate and adequate instructions on distinguishing Federal record, Presidential record, and nonrecord materials.
To show that they are not unlawfully destroying electronic "records" in violation of the FRA, defendants must sustain all three of these assertions.
As we show below, defendants' position is contrary to law on all three points.
First, we show that the vast majority of the materials stored on PROFS and other electronic mail systems are "records" under the statutory definition.
Defendants' claim that most electronic mail is nonrecord is unsupported by any examination of their system, and is contradicted by the important, substantive PROFS communications disclosed through the outside investigations of the NSC's activities in the Iran-Contra Affairs.
Moreover, their assertion that only those materials that they deem "appropriate for preservation" are records under the statute misstates the law and results in the unlawful disposal of records without independent appraisal or authorization from the Archives.
Second, we show that defendants' argument that materials stored in electronic format are merely extra copies of paper records, preserved only for convenience of reference, must be rejected for two independent reasons: (A) The factual premise for the argument fails because defendants never issued guidelines instructing staff to print paper copies of all electronic mail materials that satisfy the definition a Federal record.
Indeed, the EOP and NSC manuals on recordkeeping in use since 1985 contain no instructions on printing-out electronic mail, and the new guidelines issued after this suit began still do not contain the instruction defendants claim.
(B) Even if the instruction defendants rely upon had been given, the electronic recordings that defendants routinely destroy do not fall within the statutory exception.
The electronic materials are not "extra copies" because their form and content are unique.
In addition, the facts show that they are not used "only for convenience of reference."
Id. Third, we show that defendants have given staff erroneous or inadequate instructions on identifying Federal records.
The NSC has erroneously instructed staff that certain materials that qualify as records should be treated as nonrecord material.
The EOP has given inadequate instructions on identifying record material in electronic mail communications.
And, finally, both the EOP and NSC have erroneously instructed staff that certain materials made and received by agency personnel are not Federal records but Presidential records.
Fourth, we show that, in addition to these violations of the statute, defendants have ignored electronic mail in their recordkeeping program.
The NSC and the EOP have never taken the steps prescribed by the Archivist to properly manage these records and establish safeguards against their destruction.
Finally, we address Count IV, plaintiffs' claim concerning the Archivist's conduct.
The investigations of the Iran-Contra Affairs have demonstrated that electronic mail communications of significant historical value were not preserved in the NSC's official records system and that these communications can be recovered from the backup tapes of the PROFS system.
Despite this, the Archivist has failed to perform his statutory duty to initiate action to ensure that records from these tapes are recovered and placed in the agencies' record systems, and he has abdicated his responsibility to take action to correct the recordkeeping violations of the EOP and NSC.
ARGUMENT I. THE INFORMATION PRESERVED ON DEFENDANTS' ELECTRONIC MAIL SYSTEMS IS "RECORD" MATERIAL UNDER THE FRA.
Defendants deny that the preserved PROFS backup tapes contain Federal records, and argue that most electronic mail materials are not "records" under the FRA because only those materials that they have deemed "appropriate for preservation" are "records."
Defs' Statement of Material Facts 28; Defs' Motion for Summary Judgment at 27; Defs' Supplementary Brief on Summary Judgment at 20; SoF 65, 128.
This contention is erroneous as a matter of fact and law.
The facts show that defendants have never reviewed their electronic mail systems to determine the amount of record material they contain.
The investigations that have looked at materials stored on PROFS backup tapes show that PROFS is used for important, substantive communications that are "appropriate for preservation."
Finally, the law also provides that materials that are, in fact, "preserved" are records and must be handled in accordance with the procedures mandated by the FRA. A. Defendants' Assertion That Most Electronic Mail Is Nonrecord Material Lacks Any Foundation.
Defendants instruct their staff that "the most common types of electronic mail notes are non-record materials."
SoF 128.
Indeed, this is a fundamental premise of their argument that it is rational for them to treat electronic mail as nonrecord material.
**3.
Defs' Motion for Summary Judgment at 7, 38 (filed Aug. 28, 1991) ("Given the nature of the PROFS system, it is unlikely that a significant portion of these materials would contain substantive information about formal government business."); see also Defendants' Reply to Plaintiffs' Opposition to Defendants' Motion to Dismiss or Alternatively for Summary Judgment at 23 (filed March 10, 1989) ("PROFS is merely a medium used largely for transmittal of non-substantive messages").* The premise, however, has no foundation in fact.
Defendants have never undertaken any examination, inspection or survey to determine how often staff use electronic mail to conduct agency activities, or to determine how much of the material stored on the system and backup tapes contains valuable information.
SoF 67, 68.
Other agencies and entities that have conducted such surveys have discovered that substantial amounts of important, and sometimes unique, "record" information is stored by users of electronic mail systems.
**4.
See Plfs' Declarations and Exhibits, Tab 1, Nowicke Dec. 8-10 (describing electronic mail archiving study by Navy Laboratories); id. Tab 2, Electronic Mail Use at the [World] Bank: A Survey and Recommendations, 17, 22, 45 (finding 96% of electronic mail communications contain substantive business information, and 50% of electronic mail is retained for future use)** As we discuss below, the facts indicate that the use of the EOP's and NSC's electronic mail system to convey and record decisions, events, and important information is just as widespread.
Defendants' failure to perform any evaluation of their electronic mail systems alone demonstrates that their recordkeeping program is arbitrary and capricious.
Agency actions are "arbitrary and capricious" when the agency fails to consider relevant data and aspects of the problem.
Motor Vehicle Mftrs.
Assoc. v. State Farm Mutual Auto.
Ins. Co., 463 U.S. 29, 42-43 (1984); Citizens to Preserve Overton Park v. Volpe, 401 U.S. 402 (1971).
In this case, the recordkeeping guidelines at issue have been adopted without any effort to ascertain the most basic and essential information concerning the agencies' electronic mail systems, or the practices of the agency personnel using them.
B. Electronic Mail Communications Stored On The Backup Tapes And Electronic Mail Systems Are Records Because They Are Preserved Or Appropriate For Preservation.
Under the FRA, documentary materials have "record status" if they meet two conditions: (1) They are made or received by an agency of the United States Government under Federal law or in connection with the transaction of agency business; and (2) They are preserved or appropriate for preservation as evidence of agency organization and activities or because of the value of the information they contain.
36 C.F.R. 1222.34(b); 44 U.S.C. 3301.
Virtually all materials on defendants' electronic mail systems meet the first condition.
With respect to the second condition, it is evident that many, if not most, of the electronic mail communications contain information on the organization and activities of the agencies, or materials that are retained by agency staff because of the value of the information they contain.
SoF 64.
Indeed, these systems are designed to be one of the principal means of intra- and inter- agency communications for these agencies.
SoF 8-10.
These systems have significant advantages over telephone or paper communications, and the NSC system is specifically designed to permit the communication of sensitive, classified information.
SoF 11-13, 31.
Moreover, in opposing sampling of the backup tapes, defendants have affirmatively argued that PROFS has been used "heavily for substantive business communications" and contains privileged materials concerning government decisionmaking.
Id. 14, 15.
Thus, apart from personal communications, electronic mail communications will satisfy the test for "record status" if they are "preserved or appropriate for preservation."
44 U.S.C. 3301.
1.
The Backup Tapes Contain Communications That Are Appropriate for Preservation.
The facts revealed through the use of the PROFS backup tapes in previous investigations preclude any serious argument that these tapes do not contain material that is "appropriate for preservation" as "records" of the activities of the government.
During the course of the Iran-Contra investigations, numerous electronic records were recovered from the backup tapes that did not exist anywhere in paper form.
SoF 57.
Presidential, congressional, and independent investigators all found that these electronic records provided a "first-hand, contemporaneous account of events" concerning key policy decisions and activities of the Reagan Administration.
SoF 56, 61.
These records have not only been used as evidence in criminal trials by the Independent Counsel, but have also been used by the Justice Department and the NSC to conduct their own investigations of matters unrelated to the Iran-Contra scandal.
SoF 58, 59.
Defendants cannot dismiss the materials that have been recovered in these investigations as exceptional, or claim that other individuals, discussing other subjects, did not use electronic mail in the same manner -- especially since they have steadfastly refused to provide a sample of the materials on the tapes.
To the contrary, while the subject matter may have been unique, the types of communications uncovered during the Iran- Contra investigations are precisely the type of communications that the NSC and EOP PROFS systems are designed to facilitate: "a written memo, or letter form of correspondence" that can be conveyed with the speed of a telephone call, and saved for future reference.
SoF 17, 11-12.
Long after the Iran-Contra Affairs, the NSC was reporting that PROFS notes to senior officials were increasing "both in volume and length," id. 24, and the EOP has more than doubled the number staff using its electronic mail system since 1989.
Id. 6.
There is, in short, no reason to believe that the use of electronic mail during the Iran-Contra Affairs was an aberration, or that other individuals have not used electronic mail to convey equally important information on budgetary issues, trade issues, foreign policy issues, or other actions of the government.
Nor can defendants argue that the fact that these records appear only on the backup tapes, and not in paper, is attributable to lack of compliance with the NSC's recordkeeping guidelines by a few individuals.
**5.
Indeed, the searches that have been conducted of the preserved NSC tapes by the Independent Counsel and the Justice Department have not been limited to electronic mail of a few individuals, but have covered scores of NSC staff.
SoF 56c, 57, 58.
Defendants' argument that investigators searched the records of all these individuals because all of them were suspected of attempting to conceal improper conduct is not substantiated or credible.
See Defs' Reply Brief in Opposition to Plfs' Motion for a Sampling at 3-4** As we show below, during the Iran-Contra Affairs the NSC had no guidelines, written or oral, instructing its staff to print out electronic mail communications to place them in the NSC's official record system.
The PROFS notes uncovered during the Iran-Contra investigations were not made part of the NSC's record system because (i) the NSC guidelines in 1985 and 1986 did not treat them as record material and, (ii) as the notes have been printed out for investigators from 1987 to the present, the records personnel at the NSC have continued to treat them as nonrecords.
SoF 62, 63, 109.
There is every reason to believe that there are additional records on the NSC tapes, some of which were never even searched in these prior investigations.
There is also every reason to believe that the same types of records appear on the EOP tapes, none of which have ever been searched for record material.
Defendants' contention that these tapes, despite their historical importance, are not appropriate for preservation is plainly erroneous in light of these facts.
2.
Electronic Communications Preserved By Agency Personnel Are Records Under The FRA.
Defendants consistently misstate the law by asserting that only those materials that an agency deems worth preserving are records.
The statutory definition of record, however, is not limited to the agency's judgment of what is "appropriate for preservation," but also includes documentary materials that are preserved.
44 U.S.C. 3301.
While "appropriate for preservation" covers materials "which in the judgment of the agency should be filed," 36 C.F.R. 1222.12(b)(6), the term "preserved" in the definition of "record" establishes an objective test that requires that materials that are "actually filed or otherwise systematically maintained" be treated as records.
36 C.F.R. 1222.12(b)(5); accord Plfs' Appendix, Tab 7, 3.
This objective requirement is necessary to safeguard against agencies innocently or intentionally underestimating the value of their own records.
Under the FRA, if materials are labelled "nonrecord," they require only agency approval for disposition, and there is no outside review of the agency's judgment.
36 C.F.R. 1222.42.
On the other hand, if materials satisfy the definition of "record," they can be destroyed only after appraisal by the Archivist to assess their archival value.
44 U.S.C. 3303, 3303a, 3314; see Plfs' Appendix, Tab 9, p. 9.
Defendants seek to evade this outside review by asserting that they are free to label materials "nonrecord" and destroy them -- even though the materials have actually been preserved by agency personnel.
The definition of record precludes such unilateral control by agencies by providing that any materials that are, in fact, filed and stored within the agency are "records."
36 C.F.R. 1222.12(5).
**6.
Under this objective test, many materials that do not have ongoing value, will qualify as "records."
These materials may be destroyed after a period of weeks, months, or years as "temporary records," but only with the approval of the Archivist.
See Plfs' Appendix, Tab 8, at 14 (95% of all records are temporary records).
Because of their important role in the government, the Archivist has determined that a large portion of the records of the NSC and other EOP components are of sufficient value to be permanent records.
See, e.g., Moore Dep., Exhibit 74 (NSC Request for Disposition Authority).** Most of the materials stored by PROFS clearly satisfy this prong of the statutory definition of record because they are filed and stored by agency personnel in the course of conducting government business, much like paper records are stored: y Notes.
Electronic mail notes are filed in "note logs" by individuals using electronic mail in a manner that is directly analogous to filing letters or memoranda in a paper file.
See Plfs' Appendix, Tabs 14 and 17; SoF 19, 32.
Moreover, both the NSC and EOP instruct users to regularly remove any unneeded notes from their files, so most of the notes that are actually stored are communications that staff consider necessary to their work.
SoF 33.
**7.
PROFS has a separate function for transitory communications that are never stored, called "messages."
SoF 16.
Because they are never filed or stored, messages are analogous to a paper document that is discarded shortly after it is received and are not "preserved" under the definition of "record.** y Documents.
PROFS documents are filed in a central storage system of the computer, and may be retained indefinitely.
Indeed, the EOP instructs PROFS users that documents are retained for at least two-years, and the retention period can be extended.
SoF 34.
y Calendars.
PROFS calendars of EOP and NSC staff are also filed in a central storage area of the computer, and are kept indefinitely.
The EOP even instructs PROFS users that their calendars are "archived" each year, and old calendars can be recovered from storage.
SoF 35.
y Backup Tapes.
The regular practice of making "backup copies" of PROFS communications also demonstrates that these materials are "preserved" under the definition of record.
SoF 36-37.
Such backup files are specifically identified as records under the Archivists' General Records Schedules.
See General Records Schedule 20 (attached to Mosley Dec., Exhibit A), p. 5, 8.
Thus, under the statutory definition, the materials stored on PROFS that concern agency activities, or have been preserved by staff "because of the informational value of the data in them," satisfy the statutory definition of "records."
44 U.S.C. 3301.
This is true regardless of whether the communications are short, informal, or routine, since such communications qualify as records under the statute.
Many of such materials may be temporary records, but the FRA does not permit the NSC and EOP to summarily destroy them as nonrecord material; the agencies must comply with the records management and disposition requirements designed to identify and preserve those materials that are of permanent value.
Defendants' effort to evade this obligation by deeming all of their electronic materials to be not "appropriate for preservation" is contrary to law.
Indeed, the prospect of the NSC having the authority to determine, without any outside review, that files documenting a notorious period in the agency's history shall be discarded as nonrecord material illustrates the importance of the FRA requirement that materials that are actually preserved may not be destroyed without independent review by the Archives.
II.
ELECTRONIC MAIL MATERIALS ARE NOT "EXTRA COPIES PRESERVED ONLY FOR CONVENIENCE OF REFERENCE."
Defendants' principal argument in support of their motion for summary judgment is that the EOP's and NSC's "employees have been repeatedly instructed to print out and send to their formal records systems any Federal records contained in their computer files."
Defs' Memorandum in Support of Summary Judgment at 3, 8, 12-13, 16, 23.
Presuming that employees implement this instruction, defendants assert that the information stored on their electronic mail system and backup tapes either does not rise to the level of a Federal record, or can be treated as "nonrecord" materials because the electronic media are merely "extra copies of documents preserved only for convenience of reference."
Id. at 13, 29-30, 32; Defs' Statement of Material Facts 28.
Based on this instruction and the statutory exemption, defendants argue, they are permitted to destroy electronic mail materials without any authorization from the Archivist.
This argument fails for two independent reasons.
First, the facts show that the instruction on printing-out electronic mail that defendants rely upon for their argument was not, and still is not, given as part of the recordkeeping guidelines of the EOP and NSC.
Second, as a matter of law, even if copies of the electronic mail communications that qualify as Federal records are printed on paper, defendants' argument is inconsistent with the statute and the Archivists' guidance because the original, electronic media are not "extra copies" of the paper, nor are they "used only for convenience of reference."
44 U.S.C. 3301.
A. Defendants Originally Gave No Instructions On Preservation Of Electronic Mail, And Now Give Instructions That Are Erroneous As A Matter of Law.
Review of the manuals and memoranda defendants have given to their staff shows that the instruction on printing electronic mail they claim to have given simply does not appear in their guidelines.
During the period that the preserved PROFS backup tapes were created, no instructions on preserving electronic mail appear in the agencies' recordkeeping manuals.
Today, some EOP components have introduced new instructions on printing electronic mail, but even these instructions do not conform to defendants' claim.
**8.
Indeed, it appears that the entire concept that PROFS materials can be disposed of without authorization from the Archives as "extra copies preserved only for convenience of reference" is a post-hoc rationalization created after this lawsuit began.
No statements by any of the NSC's or EOP's recordkeeping staff articulated this rationalization at the time the guidelines were adopted, and none of the guidelines describe PROFS backup tapes or other materials as extra copies preserved solely for convenience of reference** 1.
Defendants' Recordkeeping Guidelines During The Period That The Information On The Preserved Backup Tapes Was Created. a.
The EOP's Guidelines.
The written records management guidance for the components of the EOP that use PROFS is set forth in a single manual, referred to here as the EOP "Federal Records Manual."
The Manual (in its 1982 and 1989 versions) was the exclusive written guidance on Federal records for EOP component agencies other than the NSC from 1982 through 1991, and is still the exclusive guidance for most EOP components today.
SoF 91.
Neither manual contains any instruction stating that electronic materials that satisfy the definition of "record" should be printed for preservation in hard- copy format.
SoF 92.
At her deposition, the head of the EOP office that runs the records management program for the EOP acknowledged that she could not point to any statement in the Manual that instructed staff that they must print-out electronic mail materials for preservation in hard-copy format.
See Anton Dep. at 210:21-212:4.
**9.
The EOP also failed to take advantage of opportunities to issue instructions on preserving electronic mail record before they were to be erased at the end of the Reagan Administration.
See SoF 96; Plfs' Appendix, Tab 1, at 3 (section on "Change of Administration Considerations," and "Document Selection for Archives" in PROFS training manual never completed); SoF 97 (memoranda announcing erasure of computer records at end of Reagan Administration contains instructions on printing Presidential records on computer files, but no instructions that PROFS materials that satisfied the definition of a Federal record should be printed out); SoF 98 (memoranda on preparing files for disposition at end of Reagan Administration contain no instructions on computer records)** b.
The NSC's Guidelines.
1985-March, 1987.
Throughout the period of the Iran- Contra Affairs (1984-November 25, 1985), the NSC did not give staff using its electronic mail systems any instructions concerning the preservation of electronic records.
The only written guidelines issued to the NSC staff during this period are those in the 1984 "National Security Council Administrative Manual," attached as Exhibit D to the Second Declaration of George Van Eron.
The Manual not only does not contain the instruction the NSC relies on in its Summary Judgment motion -- it contains no mention of electronic records and no definition of Federal records.
SoF 109.
Indeed, the lack of any obligation to preserve PROFS communications was confirmed during the trial of Oliver North.
One of the counts against Oliver North charged violation of 18 U.S.C. 2071, which prohibits the willful and unlawful destruction of any record of a public office.
In support of this claim, prosecutors introduced the 1984 NSC Administrative Manual into evidence and presented testimony from the NSC's records officer, Brenda Reger.
**10.
Trial Transcript, Unites States v. Oliver North, C.A. 88-80, pp. 5468-71 (D.D.C., March 23, 1989) (attached at Tab 17 of Plfs' Exhibits in Opposition to Defs' Motion for Summary Judgment (filed Sept. 19, 1991))**
On cross-examination, Ms. Reger acknowledged that, under the guidelines in the Manual, NSC personnel were permitted to throw away PROFS notes and delete them from their computer because they were not considered "official records" of the agency.
Id. 5483:21- 84:12; SoF 110.
**11.
Based on this testimony, North's lawyers successfully argued that North could not be convicted of violating 18 U.S.C. 2071 based on the destruction of PROFS notes.
See Plfs' Supplemental Filing of New Evidence in Support of Plaintiff's Opposition to Defendants' Motion for Summary Judgment, Suppl.
Exhibit 9 (filed May 11, 1989), Trial Transcript, at 6227-6231.
As a result, the jury was instructed not to consider any evidence concerning the destruction of PROFS notes in connection with the 2071 count.
United States v. North, 716 F. Supp. 644, 647 (D.D.C. 1989)** Nothing in the agency's guidelines during this period instructed the staff to print these materials.
**12.
On January 15, 1987, approximately six weeks after the Iran Contra scandal became public, the NSC issued two memoranda concerning new "Document Control Procedures."
Neither memorandum, however, contains any discussion of electronic communications, PROFS, or even a definition of a Federal record.
SoF 109b, c** March, 1987-December, 1988.
The first NSC guideline to mention electronic records did not appear until March 5, 1987.
SoF 111-113.
The two page memorandum contained only a single sentence concerning preservation of electronic mail: Should you be tasked for action via PROFS/A1, the PROFS/A1 note should be printed and made part of the package forwarded for action by the principals.
(Second Van Eron Dec., Exhibit G).
The memorandum does not discuss Federal records, or contain any instruction that staff should print out all electronic mail that has record status for preservation in the NSC's recordkeeping system.
Indeed, the material covered by this instruction is extremely narrow.
The NSC uses the phrase "tasked for action" to mean assigned work (e.g., to prepare a memorandum, set up a meeting, etc.), and the "principals" refers to "the National Security Advisor, the Deputy National Security Advisor, and the Executive Secretary of the NSC."
Resp. to Inter.
No. 22(c); SoF 112.
Thus, this instruction only covered notes, from supervisory officials for purposes of assigning work.
The staff was not given any instructions to print calendars, documents, notes between staff, or notes used for purposes other than assigning work.
The Close of The Reagan Administration.
At the end of the Reagan Administration, the NSC, like the EOP, planned to erase all its electronic mail files on January 20, 1989, before the new administration took office.
The first, and only, document that comes close to containing the instruction that the NSC claims it "repeatedly" gave its staff (Defs' Motion for Summary Judgment at 16), is a single memorandum that was not distributed until December 20, 1988.
It stated: I ask that you review your computer files prior to your departure or January 20, 1989, whichever comes first.
Should you identify therein any federal or presidential record, as defined above, that you please forward it in hard copy to George Van Eron for appropriate action.
(Second Van Eron Dec., Exhibit H).
This instruction, however, has three fatal deficiencies.
First, the memorandum contains no definition of Federal record.
It delegates all responsibility for determining what should be saved to the staff, but the only guidance on how staff should identify such records is the statement that: The Federal Records Act requires the creation of records reflecting "the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures and essential transactions" of an agency.
Id.; SoF 125.
As guidance on what constitutes a Federal record, this statement is both incomplete and erroneous.
The definition of "record" in the FRA is not limited to "essential transactions," but encompasses any materials that are preserved or appropriate for preservation as evidence "of the activities of the Government" or "because of the informational value of the data in them."
44 U.S.C. 3301.
**13.
Moreover, the other guidelines available at this time provided no assistance since the 1984 Administrative Manual contained no instructions on distinguishing Federal record and nonrecord materials, and the March 5, 1987 memorandum suggested that only notes in which staff are "tasked for action" needed to be printed out.
See Van Eron Dec., Exhibits D and G** This error was compounded by the fact that, in May and November 1988, the NSC distributed memoranda containing instructions on Presidential records that, as we discuss below, erroneously instructed staff to treat certain Federal records as Presidential records.
SoF 187; see infra pp. -.
Second, even if accurate and adequate instructions on identifying Federal records had been given, the December 20, 1988, memorandum was too late to be effective.
Electronic mail records that were deleted before December 20, 1988, could not be preserved by the staff under this instruction (although they still may exist on the preserved backup tapes), and staff that left the Administration before December 20, 1988 never received the memorandum.
**14.
By comparison, the NSC had instructed its staff to begin reviewing their paper records to ensure their proper preservation six months earlier.
SoF 116** Third, the NSC staff at this time, and throughout the period PROFS has been in use, had limited access to printers.
Only two printers are available to print PROFS information, and all the NSC staff in a single building share a single printer.
SoF 108.
Given the NSC's claim that a single staff member may have hundreds of notes stored in his computer files at any given time, SoF 21, it was not realistic for the recordkeeping staff to rely on an instruction requiring that all of 92 staff members using PROFS review all of their communications and print them on the two printers during the last thirty days of the Administration.
In summary, during the period that the PROFS material on the backup tapes that have been preserved in connection with this action were created, the EOP gave no instructions on printing out electronic mail, and the instructions given by the NSC were incomplete, inaccurate and belated.
2.
Defendants' Recordkeeping Guidelines Since January, 1989.
Most of the components of the EOP that use electronic mail still have, as their exclusive recordkeeping guidance, the EOP Federal Records Manual.
As discussed above the Manual (even as revised in 1989 after this suit began) contains no instructions on printing electronic mail.
After this litigation began, however, three EOP components -- the NSC, the Office of Administration ("OA"), and Council on Environmental Quality ("CEQ") -- adopted separate recordkeeping guidelines instructing staff to print electronic mail.
The NSC was the first to introduce the new instruction in a January 25, 1989, memorandum telling staff that: [W]henever you have information that should be recorded under the definition of a federal or presidential record it is your responsibility to reduce it to written form and send it to the Secretariat for entry into a Secretariat record system, unless it is already contained in a written record logged into such system.
(Second Van Eron Dec., Exhibit I) (emphasis added).
A directive containing a substantially similar instruction was adopted by the OA and CEQ in late 1991.
SoF 99-102.
Contrary to defendants' representations in their Summary Judgment Motion, these new guidelines do not instruct employees to print out all notes, calendars or documents in their computer files that have record status.
These guidelines contain an important qualification.
They instruct employees that Federal records in electronic form need not be printed out if the information has already been preserved in a different record in the formal record system, or if the information is otherwise "reduced" to written form.
See Defs' Suppl.
Resp. to Inter.
No. 7(d)(i) and (ii).
Thus, the instruction creates no obligation to save the electronic record as long as the "information" is written elsewhere.
**15.
This qualification appears repeatedly, stated in different ways, in the subsequent guidance memoranda issued by the NSC and even in the certification the NSC now requires employees to sign when they depart.
SoF 126, 129, 132, 133.
At her deposition, the head of the office that issued the OA Directive in 1991 confirmed that the Directive instructs staff to preserve information in electronic records, but does not require that they preserve the electronic records themselves.
See Anton Dep. at 203:10-204:12.
Moreover, the OA Directive contains an additional infirmity in that it instructs staff to print electronic mail if it contains "official records information" that is not recorded elsewhere -- not electronic mail containing information of record status under the definition of Federal record.
The term "official records information" is not defined.
SoF 100**
These instructions are erroneous as a matter of law in stating that, if the information in an electronic mail communication appears elsewhere, there is no obligation to treat it as a record.
Under the statutory definition, two documents containing information of record status are both records.
The exemption provided in the statute only applies if the records are extra copies and, even then, only if the copy is used solely for convenience of reference.
44 U.S.C. 3301; 26 C.F.R. 1222.34(d)(2).
Thus, if two different paper documents share the same information on the activities, policies, or decisions of the agency, both are records under the FRA.
The statute does not treat electronic materials differently.
If an electronic mail note, document or calendar contains information on agency activities that is also found in a paper memorandum, both the electronic mail communication and the paper memorandum are records under the FRA. 44 U.S.C. 3301.
The distinction between having the same information and being a copy of the same record is important.
A paper record that contains the same information may state the information in a different manner, may have been written on a different date, or may be addressed to different individuals.
Indeed, studies of electronic mail suggest that electronic communications are often the first, most candid, and most crucial communication of the information.
See Plfs' Declarations and Exhibits, Tab 1, Nowicke Dec., Exhibit A, p. 73 (electronic mail has spontaneity and directness not found in official letters); SoF 56a (PROFS notes provide "first-hand, contemporaneous account of [Iran-Contra] events.").
But defendants' guidelines encourage agency personnel "to reduce" such communications to a formal, distilled paper form -- and discard the contemporaneous record as nonrecord material.
SoF 100.
This ensures that many electronic mail communications of value to investigators, researchers, and historians trying to piece together events will never be preserved.
Moreover, it violates the FRA which requires that, once a record is created, the agency must preserve the record, not just the information.
3.
Defendants' Oral Guidance.
Defendants have submitted a lengthy brief concerning the oral guidance given to their staff, arguing that such guidance fortifies their claim concerning the adequacy of their written guidelines.
Defs' Supplemental Brief In Support of Motion for Summary Judgment at 1-13, 15-20.
In fact, the testimony on oral guidance shows that the oral training defendants have given to staff concerning electronic records has been belated, limited, and contains the same errors as the written guidance: 1.
The most obvious and, perhaps, the best opportunity for giving staff effective oral guidance on preserving electronic mail is when they are first trained to use the computer.
But neither the EOP nor the NSC provides any recordkeeping guidance as part of this training.
In addition, the EOP does not include any recordkeeping guidance in the reference manual it distributes on how to use the PROFS system.
SoF 89, 96, 107.
2.
The only time staff receive regular oral guidance is when they first enter the agencies, and when they depart.
In the interim they are left to rely primarily on the written guidelines.
Neither the NSC nor the EOP provide any regular, ongoing, training for existing staff.
SoF 103, 135.
3.
The NSC recordkeeping staff could not recall giving any oral guidance that mentioned electronic records prior to the time the Iran-Contra Affairs became public in late 1986.
Even after the various investigations revealed that PROFS was being used for important substantive communications, the NSC did not hold any general meeting or institute any program for giving existing employees training concerning the preservation of electronic mail.
SoF 136, 137.
4.
The EOP's and NSC's oral guidance merely reiterates the inadequate written guidelines used by these agencies.
The recordkeeping personnel testified that they do not correct or expand upon the written guidelines, and they urge staff to adhere "as closely as possible to the exact terms of these [written] guidelines."
Menan Dec. 5; SoF 104-106, 139-143.
Thus, rather than correcting the errors in the written guidelines, the oral training reinforces them.
**16.
Defendants sometimes quote their recordkeeping staff as saying that they gave instructions that employees should print electronic mail that rises to the level of a federal record.
See, e.g., Defs' Supplemental Brief in Support of Summary Judgment at 12 (quoting Menan Dep. at 146:8-10).
Examination of the testimony, however, shows that the witnesses testified that they gave the same, qualified instruction found in the written guidelines.
See Menan Dep. at 146:11-13**
B. Electronic Mail Materials Are Not "Extra Copies Preserved Only For Convenience of Reference."
Defendants acknowledge that they have no authorization from the Archivist for their practice of routinely destroying their electronic mail materials by reusing backup tapes and permitting staff to erase material from the computer.
SoF 83, 84.
Defendants' sole justification for ignoring the statutory requirements concerning disposal is their argument that, because of their guidelines on printing electronic mail, they are entitled to treat the material in electronic format as a "nonrecord" "extra copies preserved only for convenience of reference."
Defs' Summary Judgment Motion at 12-13.
Even if defendants had given the instructions they assert, the electronic materials do not fall within this exception for three reasons.
1.
When Information Is Recorded In Both Electronic And Paper Formats, Both Formats Are Records.
Defendants' argument depends on the assumption that the format of a record is irrelevant, and when information is transferred to a different format the original can be discarded as an "extra copy."
This assumption is erroneous.
Documents recorded in the same format (i.e. two paper records) may be fungible, but documents recorded in different formats have different qualities, character, and uses that make them unique.
For example, a photographic negative and a photographic print may contain the same information, but the negative cannot be discarded as merely an "extra copy" of the print.
In the same way, electronic materials cannot be discarded as an "extra copy" of a paper print-out from the electronic original.
Each format has unique qualities that requires that they both be treated and separately appraised as records.
The Archives' guidelines interpreting the FRA confirm that defendants' position is erroneous as a matter of law.
The guidelines consistently provide that, when the identical information is recorded on paper and electronically, both the electronic and the paper formats are records, and the agency must obtain separate disposal authorization from the Archives for each format.
The Archives' 1985 guidelines on electronic records directly address this issue: If the same information is stored on more than one medium (such as paper and disk), agencies, in consultation with NARA, should schedule the disposition of all copies.
Plfs' Appendix, Tab 1, Attachment A, 5.e.; SoF 149; accord SoF 146-148, 150 (additional Archives' instructions saying that where information is recorded in paper and the electronic format, each format must be separately scheduled).
The Archives does not regard the different formats as nonrecord "extra copies" precisely because the ability to use and access information in electronic and paper formats is different.
As the Archives explains: When information is converted from paper to a machine- readable file, the nature, usefulness and accessibility of the information changes.
Therefore, the disposition of the information when maintained in machine-readable form may differ from the disposition when maintained in paper form.
Machine-readable records (including optical disks) derived from paper records must be separately scheduled, even though the paper records may already be scheduled.
Plfs' Appendix, Tab 4; SoF 147.
Accordingly, the Archives considers the format of paper and electronic material as an important factor in determining whether materials are worthy of retention.
The Archives' appraisal guidelines emphasize that electronic materials may have greater research utility, may occupy less storage space, and may be easier to access or reproduce than records containing the same information on paper.
Because separate appraisals are necessary, the electronic and paper versions of the same information must be scheduled separately, and the electronic version may be retained for a longer period, or kept by the Archives as a permanent record.
SoF 153-156.
Indeed, treating electronic records as an extra copy is particularly inappropriate for electronic mail systems such as PROFS that are designed to allow staff to create, transmit, receive and use information entirely in electronic format.
When paper records are converted to electronic media, the Archivist requires that agencies schedule both the original paper record and the electronic copy as records.
SoF 146, 148.
Where, as here, the circumstances are reversed, and the original record is electronic, it cannot be discarded as a "nonrecord" on the unverified assumption that there may be a paper copy.
2.
PROFS Contains Information Recorded Only In Electronic Form.
Independent of the change in format, the original, electronic materials from PROFS cannot be regarded as "extra copies" of paper materials because not all the information stored by PROFS is printed when notes, calendars, or documents are printed, and some of the missing information has record status.
SoF 43.
Details concerning the type of information that does not appear on the printed version are set forth in plaintiffs' statement of facts.
SoF 44-53.
We present a few examples here to illustrate the problem: y Identities of Senders and Recipients.
The identities of the agency personnel who wrote and received a record is obviously of importance to researchers and historians as evidence of the activities of the agency.
When PROFS notes are printed out, however, the paper version will not always identify the sender and recipient(s) by name but will, instead, list codes in the form of userids, or titles given to a list identifying several individuals.
See, e.g. Plfs' Appendix, Tab 18 (examples of PROFS notes using userids to identify recipients).
The names of the individuals identified by these codes is stored on PROFS in directories and distribution lists, but these lists have not been printed or treated as records by defendants.
SoF 44-46.
y Acknowledgements of Receipt.
PROFS has a function analogous to certified mail called an "acknowledgement."
If an acknowledgment is requested, PROFS will provide the sender of a note with a confirmation that the note has been received, and the precise date and time that the recipient of the note opened his or her electronic mail.
This information on the date and time of receipt for communications that staff consider important enough to require and acknowledgement is of obvious use to researchers and historians trying to reconstruct events, but neither the EOP nor the NSC give agency personnel any specific instructions on printing out acknowledgment information.
SoF 47.
y Accounting Records.
Computer systems also contain some information on agency activities generated automatically by the computer.
For example, both the NSC and EOP PROFS systems store accounting information showing when and how long individuals have been using PROFS.
This information was used by the EOP staff to monitor computer use and to charge other agencies for their use of the system; it was also introduced as evidence during the Iran- Contra trials.
The complete information stored in these files appears only in electronic format because neither the EOP nor the NSC have any practice for preserving these records on paper.
SoF 50-52.
3.
Information Recorded Electronically On PROFS Is Not Preserved Only For Convenience of Reference.
In addition to not being "extra copies," the electronic materials that defendants assert are nonrecord materials are not preserved "only for convenience of reference."
44 U.S.C. 3301.
The Archives' guidelines emphasize that this exemption is a narrow one which applies "only if the sole reason such copies are preserved is for convenience of reference."
Plfs' Appendix, Tab 7, p. 3, 5.d(2) (emphasis in original); accord 36 C.F.R. 1222.34(d)(2).
The information stored on the defendants' electronic mail systems does not satisfy this standard.
Even if an electronic mail communication is printed, the electronic version of the communication continues to be used by the agency staff for purposes other than reference.
Users can alter the information and resend it.
See Plfs' Appendix, Tab 15 (describing functions users can perform when working with stored notes).
Calendars, in particular, are continuously being used and modified in their electronic form.
Id., Tab 16 (describing operations with calendars); SoF 40-42.
The backup tapes for the electronic mail systems are also not preserved solely for convenience of reference.
The purpose of the backup tapes is not convenience, but protecting vital data from loss or destruction.
SoF 37.
These electronic backup tapes are made precisely because a paper copy of the information is not as useful as the electronic version, and the agency has taken special steps to protect and preserve the data in electronic format.
SoF 36-39.
For each of these three reasons, the information recorded by PROFS in electronic format cannot be regarded as a "nonrecord" "extra copy preserved only for convenience of reference."
Its form and content are unique, and the reasons it is preserved go well beyond convenience of reference.
III.
DEFENDANTS' GUIDELINES ON DISTINGUISHING FEDERAL RECORD, PRESIDENTIAL RECORD, AND NONRECORD INFORMATION ARE ERRONEOUS AND INADEQUATE.
An instruction to staff to print and preserve electronic mail that qualifies as a Federal record can only be effective if the staff are able to correctly distinguish among Federal, Presidential and nonrecord materials.
In this section we show that (A) the NSC has given erroneous instructions distinguishing Federal record and nonrecord material; (B) the EOP has failed to give any specific guidance on identifying Federal records in electronic mail communications; and (C) both the NSC and EOP ignore governing precedents by directing staff to treat certain Federal records as Presidential records.
A.
The NSC Has Erroneously Instructed Staff To Treat Federal Records As Nonrecord Material.
As noted above, the NSC relies on its staff, without review or oversight by recordkeeping personnel, to identify those electronic mail communications that constitute Federal records.
The guidance the NSC gives to staff on distinguishing Federal and nonrecord material, however, erroneously labels as "nonrecord" materials that, under the statute and the Archives' regulations, must be preserved as Federal records: 1.
The January 25, 1989 Memorandum.
The NSC staff are permitted to maintain "chron" or "convenience" files in their individual offices.
These files are not considered Federal records by the agency, but are treated as nonrecord material.
SoF 129- 130, 132-134.
In a memorandum, first issued on January 25, 1989, and still in use today, the NSC instructs the staff that certain materials in these files may be subject to FOIA, but "do not rise to the level of an NSC agency record" that must be treated as part of the official records of the agency.
Second Van Eron, Exhibit I.
As examples of materials that do not have record status, the memorandum identifies documents that (a) "are maintained for an extended period of time (over two weeks) or after completion of a matter," (b) "related to the management of the [NSC] interagency process or intelligence matters," and are: (i) drafts of documents seen by other members of the NSC staff or other agency personnel; [or]
Id.
This instruction is directly contrary to the statutory definition of records.
Inter- and intra- agency correspondence and documents that satisfy conditions (a) and (b) are "preserved" and contain information on the NSC's activities that bring them within the statutory definition.
Moreover, the regulations of the Archives specifically provide that drafts circulated among agency employees may have record status.
36 C.F.R. 1222.34.
This erroneous instruction is particularly important here because PROFS is designed primarily to facilitate intra-agency correspondence and sharing drafts of documents.
Thus, many of (if not most) of the record materials on PROFS will be improperly treated as nonrecord material by NSC staff following this guideline.
2.
The May 13, 1992, Memorandum.
Additional erroneous instructions were issued by the NSC in May of this year when it introduced new features into its electronic mail system requiring staff to label materials as Federal, Presidential or nonrecord material when they first create a note.
Its instructions on distinguishing record and nonrecord material contained two types of errors.
First, the NSC made no change in its previous guidelines.
Thus, in addition to the errors in the January 25, 1989 memorandum identified on the previous page, staff are also instructed to follow the previous guidance that, if the information in an electronic mail communication appears elsewhere, the electronic mail need not be preserved and may be treated as "nonrecord" material.
See Second Menan Dec., Exhibit 1, Tab B (instructing staff to follow January 25, 1989 memorandum), and Tab D.
This instruction is contrary to the FRA, for the reasons discussed above.
See supra pp. -.
Second, the NSC listed as specific examples of materials that staff should label "nonrecord" notes concerning "work schedules, scheduling meetings and appointments, and routine office procedures."
Id. and Tab C.
Each of these examples is erroneous as a matter of law.
These materials may contain evidence of agency activities, or may be preserved because of the value of the information they contain.
In either case, they qualify as records under the statutory definition.
See supra pp. -.
Indeed, record disposition schedules prepared by the Archives and the NSC recognize that appointment schedules and documents on routine administrative matters may be records.
**17.
See Archives General Records Schedule 23, 5 (attached to Mosley Dec. as Exhibit B) (calendars, schedules of meetings and appointments are "records" that must be retained for various periods of time depending on the information they contain and whether they are maintained by high level officials); NSC Request for Records Disposition Authority, Moore Dep., Exhibit 74, p. 7, 16.a. (records in paper form dealing with internal NSC administrative matters are transferred to the Archives after 20 years, and the Archives staff shall determine which materials may be discarded as "routine").
* Instructing staff to discard the same materials when they are created and stored electronically violates the FRA. B.
The EOP Has Failed To Provide Accurate, Specific Guidelines On Distinguishing Record and Nonrecord Materials.
The EOP asserts that its staff can properly determine, without review by recordkeeping personnel, whether particular electronic mail communications are record or nonrecord materials.
The written guidelines provided in the EOP's Federal Records Manual, however, provide no specific instructions to guide the staff in making these determinations.
The Manual's discussion of what constitutes a record or nonrecord material merely repeats the statutory definition and the Archives' regulations restating the definition.
See Anton Dec., Exhibit B, at 5-8.
There is no mention of electronic mail or PROFS, no reference to the types of communications that EOP staff create on electronic mail (notes, calendars, documents), nor is there any discussion of the different purposes for which EOP personnel use electronic mail.
Id.; SoF 93.
This kind of generalized instruction does not provide the "clear articulation" necessary to manage electronic mail records for two reasons.
36 C.F.R. 1222.30(a).
First, an agency does not satisfy its statutory obligation to establish a recordkeeping program by merely providing staff with a copy of the general definition of "record."
Agencies are required to "[i]dentify and prescribe specific categories of documentary materials to be systematically created or received and maintained by agency personnel."
Id. 1222.32 (emphasis added).
But the EOP's Manual contains no specific instructions to make clear to staff that electronic calendars used to schedule agency business, documents shared with other personnel using the computer, and notes used to carrying-out agency business are records and must be preserved.
Cf.
American Friends Serv.
Comm. v. Webster, 720 F.2d at 66 (records disposal instructions that lack specificity are arbitrary and capricious).
Second, because electronic communications may be changed more easily than paper records, special instructions are needed to alert staff to the ongoing need to evaluate whether a new electronic record has been created.
The 1985 Guidelines on Electronic Recordkeeping issued by the Archives underscore this point by noting that "[t]he decision about whether an electronic document is a record needs to be made much earlier than for paper because of the ease of erasing or changing the record," and "[t]
Substantive updates to such electronic records probably constitute new records while minor changes probably do not."
Plfs' Appendix, Tab 1, Attachment A, 5b, c. Neither the EOP nor the NSC has ever provided such guidance to their staff.
C.
The EOP and NSC Have Erroneously Instructed Staff To Treat Federal Records As Presidential Records.
A long line of precedents has established the guidelines for determining whether records of the EOP components are Presidential records or Federal records.
The EOP's and the NSC's recordkeeping guidelines, however, ignore the applicable precedents and the statutory provisions, and instruct agency personnel to treat Federal records as Presidential records as a way of evading compliance with the FRA and the Freedom of Information Act.
1.
EOP Records Are Agency Records Unless The Sole Function of The Component Agency Is To Advise And Assist The President.
The test for distinguishing agency and Presidential records was first articulated in Soucie v. David, 448 F.2d 1067 (1971).
In Soucie the plaintiff sought a report prepared by the Office of Science and Technology ("OST") which evaluated a federal government program.
OST withheld the report arguing that OST was not an "agency" under the Administrative Procedure Act, but staff to the President, because its responsibilities included both (1) evaluating scientific research of federal agencies, and (2) advising and assisting the President.
Id. at 1073.
The Court rejected this argument, saying: If the OST's sole function were to advise and assist the President, that might be taken as an indication that the OST is part of the President's staff and not a separate agency.
In addition to that function, however, the OST inherited from the National Science Foundation the function of evaluating federal programs.
. . .
By virtue of its independent function of evaluating federal programs, the OST must be regarded as an agency subject to the APA and Freedom of Information Act.
Id. at 1075 (emphasis added).
Although the report at issue was prepared at the request of the President, and not at the independent initiative of the OST, the Court held that it was an agency record subject to release under the FOIA unless it was covered by a specific exemption.
Id.
In 1974, Congress amended the FOIA and endorsed the result in Soucie.
A new definition of "agency" was added that expressly included any "other establishment in the executive branch of the Government (including the Executive Office of the President."
5 U.S.C. 552(f).
**18.
As a result of amendments to FOIA in 1986 this section, originally designated 552(e), was redesignated as 552(f)** The legislative history explained: [w]ith respect to the meaning of the term "Executive Office of the President" the conferees intend the result reached in Soucie v. David . . . .
The term is not to be interpreted as including the President's immediate personal staff or units in the Executive Office whose sole function is to advise and assist the President.
H.R. Rep. No. 1380, 93rd Cong., 2d Sess. 15 (1974), reprinted in FOIA Source Book: Legislative History, Texts, and Other Documents, Committee on Government Operations, U.S. House of Representatives 232 (1975).
When Congress passed the Presidential Records Act ("PRA") in 1978, it incorporated this test again by providing that materials that are records of an "agency" under FOIA are excluded from the definition of Presidential records.
44 U.S.C. 2201(2)(B)(i).
Thus, Presidential records are defined as those "records which currently fall outside the scope of the Freedom of Information Act" under the sole function test announced in Soucie and adopted in the 1974 amendments.
H. R. No. 95-1487, 95th Cong., 2d Sess. 3, 11 (1978), reprinted in 1978 U.S. Code Cong.
&
Put another way, the statute provides that the definition of "agency record" trumps the PRA provisions so that, if a document concerning the President's duties is created or obtained by personnel in an agency subject to the FOIA, it is not a Presidential record, its release is governed by FOIA, and its retention is controlled by the FRA.
Since the 1978 PRA and 1974 amendments to the FOIA, the Supreme Court has endorsed the "sole function" test as the governing standard.
See Kissinger v. Reporters Committee for Freedom of the Press, 445 U.S.C. 136, 156 (1980) (quoting language from H.R. Rep. No. 1380 above).
Subsequent cases have reaffirmed its use and have stressed that: Depending on the general nature of its functions, a particular unit is either an agency or it is not.
Once a unit is found to be an agency, this determination will not vary according to its specific function in each individual case.
Ryan v. Department of Justice, 617 F.2d 788, 788 (D.C.
Cir. 1980); accord Pacific Legal Found. v. Council on Environmental Quality, 636 F.2d 1259, 1262-63 (D.C.
Cir. 1980); Rushforth v. Council of Economic Advisors, 762 F.2d 1038, 1040-43 (D.C.
Cir. 1985); Energy Research Found. v. Defense Facilities Safety Bd., 917 F.2d 581, 584-85 (D.C.
Cir. 1990).
The EOP guidelines on recordkeeping adhere to this test for some, but not all EOP components.
They correctly provide that the records of EOP components whose sole function is to advise and assist the President are Presidential records (i.e. the White House Office, the Office of Policy Development, the Council of Economic Advisers), and that the records of four components that have independent functions are Federal records (i.e. the Office of Management and Budget, the Office of the United States Trade Representative, Council on Environmental Quality, and the Office of Administration).
SoF 157.
But, as we show below, the guidelines given to the Office of Science and Technology Policy ("OSTP") and the NSC, erroneously tell staff to treat Federal records as Presidential records using the very distinctions rejected by the courts in Soucie and subsequent cases.
In addition, the guidelines fail to address the records of the Reagan and Bush Administrations' regulatory task forces.
2.
The Guidelines of The OSTP Erroneously Label Federal Records As Presidential Records.
The OSTP is successor to OST, the agency whose records were at issue in Soucie, supra, and its staff was among the primary users of the EOP's PROFS system.
SoF 4.
Like OST, OSTP provides advice and assistance to the President, and performs independent functions of reviewing and coordinating information on science and technology.
SoF 160-165.
The EOP also recognizes that OSTP is an agency subject to FOIA, but the OSTP recordkeeping guidelines do not adhere to the result in Soucie.
Instead, they provide: The records of the Office of Science and Technology Policy are federal records; however, those records produced or received by the Director of OSTP in his role as Science Advisor to the President are Presidential records and should be segregated as such.
SoF 157 (emphasis added).
The EOP recordkeeping staff interpret this guideline as providing that any records produced or received by OSTP staff in assisting the Director in his capacity as advisor to the President are not Federal records.
SoF 167.
This guideline is directly contrary to the holding of Soucie, where the court held that the fact that the OST records were prepared for the Director of the agency in response to a request for assistance from the President did not change their character as an agency record.
448 F.2d at 1076.
Subsequent cases have repeatedly rejected the claim that records are agency records only when the agency is "performing its non-advisory functions," and are presidential records when staff are "performing its other function of advising the president."
Ryan, 617 F.2d at 788.
Thus, the OSTP guidelines are contrary to law and violate the FRA because, even if staff print electronic mail records for preservation, records relating to assistance to the Director of OSTP as advisor to the President would be erroneously categorized as Presidential records and would not be maintained in accordance with the FRA. SoF 169.
3.
The Guidelines of The NSC Erroneously Label Federal Records As Presidential Records.
The NSC's statutory mandate also includes both advising the President on national security matters and performing independent functions (e.g. providing direction to the Central Intelligence Agency).
SoF 171.
The NSC also acknowledges that it is an "agency" under the FOIA.
SoF 172.
Nevertheless, the NSC has established an elaborate central filing scheme for NSC staff records in which separate file systems are maintained for Presidential records and Federal records.
Electronic mail records, if they are preserved at all in paper form, are incorporated into this dual filing system.
Although NSC staff have access to materials in both the Presidential and the Federal records files, only those placed in the Federal records files are handled in accordance with the FRA. SoF 210, 193-198, 218-221.
**19.
The propriety of this dual filing system was raised in 1986 in Penny Bevis, et al. v. National Security Council, C.A. No. 85- 2933, which involved a FOIA request for documents concerning the activities of Oliver North and other members of the NSC staff with the Nicaraguan Contras.
The NSC claimed that it was not obligated to search for or release any such materials in its presidential files, but Judge Jackson found that issue was governed by Soucie, supra, and the subsequent decision in Ryan v. Department of Justice, supra, and denied the government's motion to dismiss.
On interlocutory appeal, the Court of Appeals remanded the record for findings of fact on whether the NSC had control over the documents in question.
The NSC entered into an extensive stipulation concerning its filing system, but the case settled before any findings were entered.
See Plfs' Appendix, Tab 20, Order Denying Defendants' Motion to Dismiss, C.A. No. 85-2933 (D.D.C.
May 30, 1986); Order Remanding Record (D.C.
Cir. July 14, 1986).**
The following guideline is used by the NSC to distinguish Presidential and Federal record material: The records of the National Security Council staff are federal records if they were received or created in connection with the work of the statutorily-created National Security Council.
Additionally the NSC's internal administrative records are federal records.
The records of the National Security Council staff are Presidential records if they were received or created for the President, the Assistant to the President for National Security, his Deputy, or a member of the White House staff independently of any meeting or policy and staff actions of the NSC.
(Second Menan Dec., Exhibit 1, Tab A); see also SoF 186-192.
When applied to electronic mail, the NSC's instruction results in the improper handling of Federal records on two different levels: (a) electronic mail communications between members of the NSC staff are not handled in accordance with the FRA; (b) the Presidential Records Act is used as a basis for exempting communications between the NSC staff and the Assistant to the President for National Security Affairs ("APNSA") and Deputy APNSA from the FRA and FOIA. a.
The NSC's Guidelines Improperly Classify Communications Between NSC Staff As Presidential Records.
The NSC's guidelines could not be more explicit in violating the "sole function" test.
The guidelines are not limited to records created by the APNSA or his Deputy, but provide that electronic communications between the members of "the NSC staff when acting as advisors to the President are considered presidential records."
SoF 188.
Thus, the NSC maintains that -- unlike the staff of the OMB, CEQ and other units with dual functions -- the electronic mail of its staff relating to advisory functions is exempt from the FRA.
This "on again-off again definition" of whether materials are Federal or Presidential is precisely what was rejected in Soucie and subsequent cases.
Rushforth v. Council of Economic Advisors, 762 F.2d at 1041 (citing Pacific Legal Foundation, supra, and Ryan v. Department of Justice, supra).
Under the "sole function" test the NSC is an "agency" and all records made or received by its staff, whether they are used to assist the President, or perform the functions of the NSC, are Federal records subject to FOIA, exempt from the PRA, and governed by the FRA.
These decisions applying the sole function test have noted that, without the bright line adopted in Soucie, agencies would be able to exempt a large portion of the agency's business from the open-government laws.
See Ryan, 617 F.2d at 787-89.
This is precisely the result that the NSC has sought to achieve with its dual filing systems for Federal and Presidential records.
For example, as much as three-quarters of the memoranda produced by the staff are placed in the presidential files, where the NSC treats them as exempt from the FRA and release under FOIA.
SoF 203.
**20.
This figure is significant for the treatment of electronic mail communications because the NSC's guidance instructs staff to attach PROFS materials that are printed-out to staff memoranda when sending them to the Secretariat's central files.
SoF 112, 121**
The NSC's most recent instructions on classifying electronic mail records indicate how broadly the NSC has stretched the concept of Presidential records in order to exempt the staff's computer communications from the FRA: Presidential records are those created for the President, the National Security Advisor, the Deputy National Security Advisor, or any member of the White House staff independently of interagency meetings or NSC policy papers or oversight of intelligence activities.
Examples include notes about: OMB or Cabinet referrals White House Staff Secretary referrals Speeches Congressional correspondence Public correspondence Presidential messages or proclamations Presidential reports, certifications or determinations.
(Second Menan Dec., 4, Exhibit 1 and Tab C).
Several aspects of this instruction are striking.
First, it encompasses any notes created in connection with tasks "for" the presidential advisors, even if the advisors did not write or receive the communication.
Second, notes concerning communications with the public, Congress, OMB and Cabinet level agencies are transformed into non-agency records in the hands of the NSC staff, according to this guideline.
Third, presidential reports, certifications and determinations are obviously used by NSC staff both in providing advice to the President and in performing purely agency functions for the NSC, but the NSC instructs staff to classify any notes concerning these matters as Presidential records.
Thus, the instruction unlawfully exempts a whole host of communications among NSC staff that are plainly records under FOIA and the FRA.
Moreover, it is apparent that the NSC's guidelines are impossible to apply in practice.
NSC staff perform the same types of duties when aiding the APNSA in the interagency process and aiding the APNSA in providing advice to the President, so that labeling some communications federal and others presidential is largely an arbitrary determination.
SoF 182, 183.
This was illustrated during the course of depositions in this action.
George Van Eron testified that for twelve years he was the principal NSC official in charge of applying the NSC's guidelines on this issue, but when asked to apply the guidelines to two PROFS notes, he could not determine whether either of the two PROFS notes would be "agency records" under the NSC's guidelines.
SoF 214.
Moreover, despite repeatedly consulting with counsel, Mr. Van Eron could not explain what additional information would be necessary to determine the classification of the notes, or articulate any specific factor used to classify notes as agency or presidential.
See Van Eron Dep. at 181-196.
If he cannot apply the guidelines, how can anyone else? **21.
Indeed, the NSC has consistently refused to say whether the PROFS notes attached here as examples, see Plfs' Appendix, Tab 18, or other PROFS notes, would be treated as Presidential, Federal, or nonrecord material under its guidelines.
See NSC Supp.
Inter.
Resp.
Nos. 23, 24** b.
The NSC's Guidelines Improperly Treat Records Of The APNSAs and Deputy APNSAs As Exempt From the FRA.
The PROFS system has never been used to communicate advice or information directly to the President, nor has it ever been used to communicate directly with a member of the President's immediate personal staff outside the NSC.
SoF 215.
It does, however, contain communications between the APNSA and Deputy APNSA and the NSC staff and, thus, presents the question of whether materials that are created or received by both agency staff and a presidential advisor are Federal or Presidential records.
As noted above, the PRA resolves this by providing that any records that are agency records under FOIA are exempt from the definition of Presidential records.
44 U.S.C. 2201.
Thus, the APNSA, as a member of the President's immediate personal staff may have records that are not agency records because they are not within the control of the agency.
Kissinger v. Reporters Comm. for Freedom of the Press, 445 U.S.C. 136, 157 (1980).
If these records, however, are made available to staff of the NSC or any other agency for performing their duties, these records become "agency records" within the meaning of the FOIA, and exempt from the definition of Presidential records.
The NSC, however, applies its guideline on distinguishing Federal/Presidential records in a way that reverses this relationship.
Thus, the NSC treats records made or received by the agency staff as exempt from FOIA and the FRA if they are created by or for the APNSA or Deputy APNSA.
This is illustrated by the NSC's treatment of the calendars of the APNSA.
Since PROFS was installed in 1985, all of the APNSAs and their Deputies have maintained electronic calendars containing their daily schedules on the NSC PROFS system.
These calendars have been regularly made available to 10 to 25 NSC staff members to assist them in performing their duties.
SoF 204-207.
The NSC acknowledges, as it must under the applicable cases, that schedules kept on calendars used by agency personnel to conduct agency business are ordinarily agency records subject to FOIA.
SoF 28; Bureau of National Affairs, Inc. v. Department of Justice, 742 F.2d 1484, 1495 (D.C.
Cir. 1984); Washington Post v. Department of State, 632 F. Supp. 607 (D.D.C. 1986).
Yet the NSC treats all of the calendars of the APNSA and Deputy APNSAs as Presidential records and, therefore, they are not made available under FOIA or transferred to the Archives under the FRA. SoF 208, 209.
The exemption created by the NSC for these materials is contrary to the language of the PRA discussed above and the decision of this Circuit in Ryan v. Department of Justice, 617 F.2d 781.
Ryan involved a FOIA request for responses to questionnaires concerning judicial nominations submitted by Senators to the Attorney General.
The Attorney General argued that these were not agency records because he has two roles, advisor to the President and administrator of the Department of Justice, and these records were held by the Department in connection with his role as advisor to the President.
Id. at 786-87.
The Court rejected this claim as untenable.
The fact that the agency personnel in control of the records were assisting the Attorney General in giving advice to the President could not transform the records "into the Attorney General's personal records as advisor to the President."
617 F.2d at 787.
"Any unit or official that is part of an agency and has non-advisory functions cannot be considered a non-agency in selected contexts on a case-by-case basis."
617 F.2d at 789.
Thus, under Ryan the calendars and other materials of the APNSAs and Deputy APNSAs communicated to NSC staff over NSC's electronic mail system are agency records subject to FOIA and the FRA. 4.
The Guidelines Fail To Identify The Records Of The Regulatory Task Forces As Federal Records.
During the Reagan Administration a "Task Force on Regulatory Relief" was established within the EOP, and its functions have been assumed by the "Council on Competitiveness" during the Bush Administration.
SoF 222, 225.
The question of whether the Task Force on Regulatory Relief is an "agency" whose records are subject to FOIA was recently addressed by Judge Joyce Hens Green in Meyer v. Bush, C.A. No. 88-3112, Memorandum Opinion, (D.D.C., Sept. 30, 1991), petition for interlocutory appeal granted, No. 92-5029 (D.C.
Cir., Jan. 30, 1992) (Plfs' Appendix, Tab 19).
Judge Green found that, under Soucie and the other precedents discussed above, the Task Force was an "agency" because, in addition to advising and assisting the President, it "had substantial, independent, directorial authority."
Id. at 13.
Because PROFS is designed to facilitate interagency communications between the EOP and outside agencies whose actions were subject to regulatory review, PROFS was particularly suited to the work of these two task forces in providing interagency oversight of regulatory actions.
SoF 4.
The EOP's guidelines, however, do not provide any guidance concerning preservation of the records of these regulatory task forces as Federal records.
Thus, under the decision in Meyer v. Bush, the EOP's past and current guidelines improperly fail to provide for the handling of electronic mail (or other records) of these agencies in accordance with the FRA.
If Judge Green's decision is affirmed on appeal, this represents yet another failure of the guidelines to properly distinguish Presidential from Federal record materials.
In their recent motion concerning plaintiffs' FOIA request, defendants assert that the Court of Appeals decision in this action holds that the PRA precludes judicial review of the improper classification of agency records as Presidential records.
See Defs' Memorandum in Support of Summary Judgment On Narrowed FOIA Requests at 49-52.
The argument is meritless.
The Court of Appeals held that if a record is a Presidential record, decisions concerning its creation, management and disposal are not subject to judicial review.
Armstrong v. Bush, 924 F.2d at 291.
It did not hold that agencies could evade the FRA or FOIA by deeming Federal records to be Presidential records.
To the contrary, the Court specifically held that the plaintiffs may obtain judicial review to ensure that "records already created [are] appropriately classified and disposed of pursuant to disposal schedules approved by the Archivist [under the FRA]
Id. at 288 (emphasis added).
Whether agencies misclassify Federal records as nonrecord or presidential materials, the agency's error violates the FRA and is subject to judicial review.
Moreover, other decisions and the PRA demonstrate that Congress has not precluded judicial review of an agency's claim that its materials are exempt from FOIA or the FRA because they are Presidential records.
The decision in Soucie and the subsequent decision in Ryan make clear that an agency's erroneous claim that its records are presidential materials is subject to de novo review under FOIA.
Indeed, in Soucie the Court rejected the agency's claim despite the fact that the White House itself had issued determination that the specific record at issue was a Presidential record.
448 F.2d at 1070 n.6.
Moreover, the PRA makes clear that Congress did not intend to narrow the scope of FOIA by precluding judicial review in cases like Soucie, but intended that "that which is subject to FOIA would remain so and that which is not now subject to FOIA would be subject to the Presidential Records Act."
H. R. No. 95-1487, supra at 11, reprinted in 1978 U.S. Code Cong.
&
Thus, by making agency records under FOIA the first exception to the definition of Presidential record, 44 U.S.C. 2201(2)(B)(i), Congress ensured that agencies could not avoid the FRA or FOIA by asserting that their records are presidential materials.
IV.
DEFENDANTS HAVE FAILED TO ESTABLISH A MANAGEMENT PROGRAM AND SAFEGUARDS FOR ELECTRONIC MAIL.
Even if defendants were to correct the legal errors in their guidelines identified above, this, alone, would not bring them into compliance with the FRA.
The FRA mandates that defendants "maintain an active, continuing program" for managing records, and institute "safeguards" against their loss in compliance with the statute and the Archivists' regulations.
44 U.S.C. 3102, 3105.
The Archivists' regulations direct agencies to take a number of specific steps in order to comply with this mandate.
See 36 C.F.R 1222.20, 1228.12, 1234.10; see also Plfs' Appendix, Tab 8, at 7 (outlining steps in disposition program).
Examination of the NSC's and EOP's recordkeeping program, however, shows that they have followed these steps only for paper records, and have ignored electronic records in each element of the process.
Taken together these omissions represent a pattern that shows that defendants still do not have a program for the active management or protection of electronic mail: y No Inspections of Electronic Mail Records.
As noted above, see p. , defendants have never undertaken any examination, inspection or survey of their electronic mail systems, despite the Archives' regulations calling for such inventories for all records.
36 C.F.R. 1222.20(b)(2), (6), 1228.12(b), 1228.22, 1228.24; 1234.10(g).
When the NSC and the EOP have conducted comprehensive reviews of their documentary materials to develop disposition schedules, they have consistently reviewed only their paper records and have omitted any review of their electronic mail systems.
SoF 81-82.
y No Ongoing Evaluation.
Agencies must conduct periodic reviews to ensure the adequacy, effectiveness and efficiency of their recordkeeping program.
Id. 1220.54, 1222.20(b)(8), 1222.50(b)(5), 1228.12(e).
This includes auditing representative samples of files, and reviewing electronic records systems for conformance to recordkeeping procedures.
36 C.F.R. 1222.50(b)(5), 1234.20(l).
The EOP and NSC have never conducted such a review, or sought to assess whether their guidelines concerning electronic mail are effective.
SoF 73, 74.
y No Safeguards Against Staff Errors In Determining Record Status.
Even with proper guidelines, there is a risk that agency staff will mistakenly or intentionally misclassify records.
Accordingly, the Archives' guidelines provide that "only records officers should determine the record or nonrecord status of files" and that staff at operating levels should not have such authority because it "weakens the disposition program by indiscriminate use of the nonrecord label and can result in the loss of valuable records."
SoF 76, 77.
In accordance with this guidance, records officers of the EOP and NSC review paper materials that staff have labeled as nonrecord materials to identify any records that have been erroneously classified.
No such oversight, however, is applied to staff treatment of electronic mail.
SoF 78.
Recordkeeping personnel still do not supervise staff use of electronic mail, no sampling is done to see that staff properly apply the guidelines, and no safeguards are in place to assure that records are not being intentionally or inadvertently destroyed.
y No Effort To Integrate Recordkeeping Requirements Into Electronic Information Systems.
Agencies are required to integrate records preservation procedures with the overall information procedures of the agency.
36 C.F.R. 1222.20(a)(2), 1234.10(b).
In the context of computerized information systems, this includes "[e]stablishing procedures for addressing records management requirements, including recordkeeping requirements and disposition, before approving new electronic records systems or enhancements to existing systems."
Id. 1234.10(d).
In the EOP and NSC, however, recordkeeping considerations have never been addressed as part of the process of installing or modifying the agencies' electronic mail systems.
Indeed, recordkeeping personnel have not been consulted, nor have they sought to consult with those responsible for installing, designing, and modifying the electronic mail systems.
SoF 72-75.
In its latest submission, the NSC reports that in May, 1992, it finally made an effort to integrate recordkeeping requirements into its electronic mail system by modifying its software so that NSC staff are required to label all notes as Federal records, Presidential records or nonrecord material when they are created, and materials identified as records are automatically copied to the Records Management Office where they are printed out and placed in the federal or presidential files systems.
No provision is made for retaining the electronic copies that the computer collects together for the Records Management Office.
SoF 134.
While this represents an improvement, this new feature underscores the omissions in defendants' recordkeeping program and the errors in their guidelines for three reasons: First, the NSC's new feature highlights the fact that the EOP has not even considered integration of recordkeeping requirements with its software, and that the NSC's own efforts are seven years late.
The type of programming the NSC has now introduced was just as feasible in 1985 and was urged by the Archives in its 1985 Bulletin.
See Plfs' Appendix, Tab 1, Attachment A, 2e, 2f.
Indeed, the NSC has been using this type of programming to require staff to label classified information since January, 1988, SoF 33, but only extended its use to recordkeeping six weeks ago.
Second, the new feature relies entirely on the operating staff to designate correctly the notes they create as Federal, Presidential, or nonrecord based on the old written guidelines.
Thus, it perpetuates the errors in the guidelines identified above, and continues the practice of delegating all determinations to the staff.
The agency still provides no safeguards, even by sampling, against intentional or inadvertent mislabeling of records.
Finally, the new feature continues the NSC's improper practice of treating material in electronic format as nonrecord material.
Even though the new feature automatically collects electronic copies of notes identified as record material in one place, and the electronic format of these materials is easier to search and manage **22.
See Nowicke Dec. 4 (copies of electronic mail notes in electronic form easier to manage than paper); SoF 200 (NSC uses electronic database to facilitate tracking of paper records)** -- the NSC still discards the electronic format of the information after a paper copy is printed.
Thus, the NSC's new recordkeeping guidance does not correct its past errors; it only automates them.
Despite the bulletins issued by the National Archives in 1985 and again in 1987 calling for agencies to establish a program for preserving electronic records, see SoF 85-88, and the Archives' more recent regulations, 36 C.F.R. 1234, the EOP and NSC have ignored their obligations and still have not instituted an "active, continuing program" with safeguards to prevent the loss of these records.
44 U.S.C. 3102, 3105.
V. THE ARCHIVIST HAS FAILED TO CARRY OUT HIS DUTY TO TAKE ACTION TO RECOVER IMPROPERLY DESTROYED AGENCY RECORDS In 1984 Congress amended the FRA to place a duty on the Archivist to take action to stop the unlawful destruction of records and to initiate action to recover lost records.
44 U.S.C. 2905(a), 3106.
As the Court of Appeals noted, these provisions were added in "direct response" to the unlawful removal of agency records by a former APNSA, Henry Kissinger, and were designed to provide a remedy against similar misconduct in the future by mandating that the Archivist take action when agency officials themselves were responsible for, or failed to respond, to the unlawful destruction of records.
Armstrong v. Bush, 924 F.2d at 292, 294.
Accordingly, the duty imposed on the Archivist by the statute is mandatory: "the FRA requires" the Archivist to take action when he becomes aware of "'any actual, impending, or threatened unlawful removal, defacing, alteration, or destruction of records.'"
Id. at 295-96 (quoting 44 U.S.C. 2905(a)).
The undisputed facts show that the Archivist has violated this mandate.
The Iran-Contra investigations produced some of the most widely publicized and notorious reports of the destruction of government records in history.
Individuals, including the APNSA, John Poindexter, testified openly before Congress and in court of erasing, altering, removing, shredding or otherwise destroying NSC records, including PROFS communications, in an effort to cover-up the scandal.
See, e.g. Moore Dep., Exhibits 70, 72.
In addition, investigators demonstrated that it is possible to recover many of the lost records by restoring lost files from the backup tapes, or by using special methods (such as a "HEX Dump") to recover deleted files from the tapes.
SoF 60, 232.
Despite his statutory obligation to respond to such reports and assure recovery of lost records, the Archivist has taken no action.
He has made no effort to contact the NSC, nor made effort to see that lost records are recovered.
Indeed, the Archives has not even made an effort to gather any information beyond the reports in the press.
SoF 228-236.
The sole explanation offered for the Archivist's failure to fulfill a mandatory statutory duty is the assertion that it was appropriate for the Archivist to take no action because the press reports indicated that the Attorney General was already aware of the destruction of records.
See Mosley Dec. 12.
This, however, only underscores the Archivist's failure to perform his duties.
The Attorney General does not have a specific duty to ensure that agencies recover unlawfully removed records, and the Independent Counsel's mandate does not include any responsibility for seeking the recovery of records.
SoF 235.
The FRA charges the Archivist with a specific, unique, and mandatory responsibility to initiate appropriate action to recover lost records.
Yet, the NSC has made no effort to make PROFS materials recovered from the backup tapes part of its records system, and the Archivist has not even inquired to determine whether the agency is taking the necessary steps to preserve the records in its possession.
SoF 233.
Thus, the Archivist is in direct violation of the duty Congress imposed to ensure that agencies like the NSC are required to take action to recover records removed or destroyed by agency officials.
**23.
Indeed, the Archivist's special responsibility in this regard is demonstrated by the fact that North's lawyers successfully argued that the Archivist's indifference to the recovery of documents removed by North cast doubt on the Independent Counsel's arguments that they were government records.
See United States v. North, 708 F. Supp. 402, 403-04 (D.D.C. 1989)** Moreover, the reports of the destruction of records that emerged from the Iran-Contra investigations were not limited to the intentional destruction of PROFS materials as part of a cover-up.
The deficiencies in the NSC's general recordkeeping guidelines were also brought to light as the Archives, through press reports, became aware that it was the practice of at least some officials, including the APNSA, to regularly erase PROFS notes.
SoF 231.
As discussed above, neither the NSC nor the EOP prohibited such practices.
The Archivist has a duty to initiate action when practices that threaten the unlawful destruction of records come to his attention.
44 U.S.C. 2905(a).
Indeed, he is authorized to review such agency records management practices, Id. 2907(c)(7), and, when he becomes aware of guidelines and practices in violation of the FRA, he has a duty to notify the agency, recommend corrective action, and notify Congress and the President if the agency fails to remedy the violations.
Id. 2115(b).
Nevertheless, the Archivist has failed to take any action to correct, or even investigate, the practices of the NSC and the EOP with respect to electronic mail.
The Archives has never reviewed the EOP's or NSC's guidelines concerning electronic records -- even though it has issued repeated bulletins and regulations directing agencies to submit copies of their electronic records directives.
See 36 C.F.R. 1222.30(b)(3), 1234.10(c); Plfs' Appendix, Tabs 1 and 2, 5.
Moreover, while the Archives has conducted periodic examinations of paper records of the NSC and EOP, it has ignored the agencies' electronic mail records.
SoF 237.
The Archivist's sole response on this issue is the assertion that, if the NSC and EOP guidelines are adequate, he has no duty to prevent the unlawful destruction of records.
Defs' Summary Judgment Motion at 32.
**24.
As a matter of law, this premise is incorrect since the Archivist's statutory duty includes responding to the unlawful destruction of records in violation of the guidelines.
Armstrong v. Bush, 924 F.2d at 295** The Archivist, however, has never reviewed the agency's guidelines or electronic mail systems to determine if the agency's practices are proper, and, as we have shown above, the agencies' practices violate the FRA.
If the Archivist had performed his duty to investigate the agencies' practices and recommend corrective action in 1985, when it declared that "[h]ead of Federal agencies should make adequate plans for keeping records in electronic form" and issue appropriate directives, the destruction of records that has occurred might have been prevented.
Plfs' Appendix, Tab 1, 5.
Instead, the Archivist has abdicated this responsibility.
As with the Iran- Contra materials, the Archivist must be ordered to initiate action to ensure that steps are taken to recover the records on the EOP and NSC backup tapes preserved in connection with this action and make them part of the agencies' official records systems.
He must also be ordered to initiate action to prevent the future destruction of electronic mail records in violation of the FRA.
CONCLUSION Defendants' motion for summary judgment should be denied.
Judgment should be entered for plaintiffs on counts II and IV of the Second Amended Complaint, and relief ordered in accordance with the accompanying order.
Respectfully submitted,
Michael E. Tankersley (D.C.
Bar No. 411978) Patti A. Goldman (D.C.
Bar No. 398565) Alan B. Morrison (D.C.
Bar No. 073114) Public Citizen Litigation Group Suite 700 2000 P Street, N.W. Washington, D.C. 20036 (202) 833-3000 Of Counsel: Kate Martin (D.C.
Bar No. 949115) Sheryl Walter American Civil Liberties Union National Security Archive Foundation 1755 Massachusetts Ave., N.W. 122 Maryland Avenue, N.E. Washington, D.C. 20036 Washington, D.C. 20002 (202 797-0882 (202) 675-2327 July 6, 1992 Attorneys for Plaintiffs
__________________________________________________________________
This page was last updated June 7, 2000.
Send comments about the website to the Archives' webmaster.
Send research questions to the Research Center.
Government agencies should contact their analyst directly.
